Utah statutes.
73-2-15.   Agreements with federal and state agencies -- Investigations, surveys or adjudications.

The state engineer, for and on behalf of the state of Utah, with the approval of the executive director of natural resources and the governor, is authorized to enter into agreements with any federal or state agency, subdivision or institution for cooperation in making snow surveys and investigations of both underground and surface water resources of the state. The state engineer is further authorized to cooperate with such agencies, subdivisions and institutions, with the approval of the executive director and the governor, for the investigation of flood and erosion control and for the adjudication of water rights. The expenses of such investigations, surveys and adjudications shall be divided between the cooperating parties upon an equitable basis.



Amended by Chapter 198, 1969 General Session

